Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-505]
Workforce development scholarship program. (a) There is established the
workforce development scholarship program to be administered by the University
of Hawaii to address projected shortfalls in and needs of the workforce. The
program shall be used to provide financial assistance for up to three years to
any qualified student enrolled at a community college campus of the University
of Hawaii.

(b) The number of
scholarships awarded and the amount of each scholarship shall be determined by
the university and shall be subject to the availability of funds. The
University of Hawaii shall offer scholarships to pay for educational costs,
such as tuition, fees, books, housing, and other educational costs; provided
that the scholarship applicant:

(1) Qualifies for Hawaii
resident tuition;

(2) Earned a high school
diploma or passed the general educational development test; and

(3) Is eligible for
need-based aid according to federal financial aid guidelines.

The scholarship may be
renewed annually for up to three years; provided that the student maintains
satisfactory academic progress. [L 2006, c 257, §3]

Revision Note

Section was enacted as an addition to repealed chapter 305,
but is codified to this chapter pursuant to L 2006, c 75, §18.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next